Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2289.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6808HH (1) 91 as/js H.F. 2289 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 726.6B Torture ââ penalty. 1 1. As used in this section: 2 a. âCruelâ means brutal, inhumane, sadistic, or tormenting. 3 b. âCustody or physical controlâ means the forcible 4 restriction of a personâs movements or forcible confinement 5 of the person so as to interfere with that personâs liberty, 6 without that personâs consent or without lawful authority. 7 c. âSerious bodily injuryâ means either of the following: 8 (1) Bodily injury that involves a substantial risk of death, 9 unconsciousness, extreme physical pain, protracted and obvious 10 disfigurement, or protracted loss or impairment of the function 11 of a bodily member, organ, or mental faculty. 12 (2) One or more of the following conditions: internal 13 injury, poisoning, serious burns or scalding, severe cuts, or 14 multiple puncture wounds. 15 d. âSevere mental pain or sufferingâ means a mental injury 16 that results in a substantial alteration of mental functioning 17 that is manifested in a visibly demonstrable manner caused by 18 or resulting from any of the following: 19 (1) The intentional infliction or threatened infliction of 20 serious bodily injury. 21 (2) The administration or application, or threatened 22 administration or application, of mind-altering substances 23 or other procedures calculated to disrupt the senses or the 24 personality. 25 (3) The threat of imminent death. 26 (4) The threat that another person will imminently 27 be subjected to death, serious bodily injury, or the 28 administration or application of mind-altering substances 29 or other procedures calculated to disrupt the senses or 30 personality. 31 2. A person who, with the intent to cause cruel or extreme 32 physical or mental pain and suffering, inflicts serious bodily 33 injury or severe mental pain or suffering upon another person 34 within the personâs custody or physical control commits torture 35 -1- LSB 6808HH (1) 91 as/js 1/ 2 H.F. 2289 and is guilty of a class âBâ felony. Notwithstanding section 1 902.9, subsection 1, paragraph âbâ , a person convicted of a 2 violation of this section shall be confined for no more than 3 fifty years. 4 3. Proof that a victim suffered pain is not an element of 5 the crime under this section. 6 4. A conviction or sentence under this section does not 7 preclude a conviction or sentence for a violation of any other 8 law of this state arising from the same transaction. 9